Illinois, session 104th, HB2700.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 5changing Sections 8-3-14b and 8-3-14c as follows: 6    (65 ILCS 5/8-3-14b)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2027)8    Sec. 8-3-14b. Municipal hotel operators' tax in DuPage 9County. For any municipality located within DuPage County that 10belongs to a not-for-profit organization headquartered in 11DuPage County that is recognized by the Department of Commerce 12and Economic Opportunity as a certified local tourism and 13convention bureau entitled to receive State tourism grant 14funds, not less than 50% 75% of the amounts collected pursuant 15to Section 8-3-14 shall be expended by the municipality to 16promote tourism and conventions within that municipality or 17otherwise to attract nonresident overnight visitors to the 18municipality, and the remainder of the amounts collected by a 19municipality within DuPage County pursuant to Section 8-3-14 20may be expended by the municipality for economic development 21or capital infrastructure.22    This Section is repealed on January 1, 2027. 23(Source: P.A. 102-699, eff. 4-19-22; 103-601, eff. 7-1-24.)   HB2700- 2 -LRB104 12075 RTM 22172 b1    (65 ILCS 5/8-3-14c)2    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2027)3    Sec. 8-3-14c. Municipal hotel use tax in DuPage County. 4For any municipality located within DuPage County that belongs 5to a not-for-profit organization headquartered in DuPage 6County that is recognized by the Department of Commerce and 7Economic Opportunity as a certified local tourism and 8convention bureau entitled to receive State tourism grant 9funds, not less than 50% 75% of the amounts collected pursuant 10to Section 8-3-14a shall be expended by the municipality to 11promote tourism and conventions within that municipality or 12otherwise to attract nonresident overnight visitors to the 13municipality, and the remainder of the amounts collected by a 14municipality within DuPage County pursuant to Section 8-3-14a 15may be expended by the municipality for economic development 16or capital infrastructure.17    This Section is repealed on January 1, 2027.18(Source: P.A. 102-699, eff. 4-19-22; 103-601, eff. 7-1-24.) 19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 20becoming law.